dictionaries/es/hyph_es.dic
socio1a2
socio1e2
socio1i2
socio1o2
socio1u2
socio1á2
socio1é2
socio1í2
socio1ó2
socio1ú2
4a3ri4o.
4a3ri2o4s.
ario1s
4a3ri4a.
4a3ri4a4s.
aria1s
3logía
lo1g
4ó4n.
ó1n
4on4e4s.
one1s
4i4e4r.
ie1r
4o2i3c4o.
oi1c
4o2i3c2o4s.
oico1s
4o2i3c4a.
4o2i3c4a4s.
oica1s
.su2b1h
.su2b2a2
.su2b2e2
.su2b2o2
.su2b2u2
.su2b2á2
.su2b2é2
.su2b2í2
.su2b2ó2
.su2b2ú2
.sub3acuá1t
.suba1c
.subi3l4l
.subi1l
.su3bi3da
.subi1d
.su3bi3do
.su3bi3do1r
.su3bi3dó1n
.su3basta
.1suba1s
.suba2s1t
.su3básta
.1subá1s
.subá2s1t
.su3bastá
.su3baste
.su3básté
.su3basto
.su3bástó
.sub3í2n1d
.subí1n
.sub3ími
.subí1m
.su4b3ra1y
.sub2r
.sub3a1ce2p1c
.subace1p
.sub3ace1t
.sub3aflue
.suba1f
.subaf2l
.sub3alcai
.suba1l
.suba2l1c
.sub3a1r2r
.suba1r
.sub3árti1c
.subá1r
.subá2r1t
.sub3atómi1c
.suba1t
.subató1m
.sub3ejecu1t
.sube1j
.subeje1c
.sub3eleme1n
.sube1l
.subele1m
.sub3emple
.sube1m
.sube2m1p
.subemp2l
.sub3e1nte1n
.sube1n
.sube2n1t
.seb3entra1d
.se1b
.sebe1n
.sebe2n1t
.sebent2r
.sub3espe1c
.1sube1s
.sube2s1p
.sub3esta1c
.sube2s1t
.sub3esti1m
.sub3estí1m
.sub3estru1c
.subest2r
.sub3occipi1t
.subo1c
.subo2c1c
.subocci1p
.sub3ofici
.subo1f
.subofi1c
.su3bordi1n
.subo1r
.subo2r1d
.su3bordí1n
.sub3urba
.subu1r
.su1bu2r1b
.sub3alime2n1t
.subali1m
.subalime1n
.su3balte1r
.suba2l1t
.sub3in2s1p
.subi1n
.1subi2n1s
.sub3i1nte1nde1n
.subi2n1t
.subinte1n
.subinte2n1d
.su3bi1r
.su3bí1r
.su3bié1n
.su3bi3mie1n
.subi1m
.su3bie1r
.1su3bie1s
.su2r1e2s1t
.su1r
.sure1s
.1su2r1oe1s
supe2r3r
su1p
supe1r
supe2r1h
supe2r1a2
supe2r1e2
supe2r1i2
supe2r1o2
supe2r1u2
supe2r1á2
supe2r1é2
supe2r1í2
supe2r1ó2
supe2r1ú2
ra5ra
1ra1r
ra5rá
ra5re
ra5ré
ra5rí
ra5ro
supe3r4a4r
supe3r4á4r
supe3r4á3vi4t.
superá1v
superávi1t
supe3r4á3vi4t4s.
1superávi2t2s
supe1r4io1r
4a3ci4ó4n.
ació1n
4a3ci4on4e4s.
acio1n
acione1s
4e3rio4r.
e1rio1r
4e3rior4e4s.
eriore1s
4e3rior4a.
4e3rior4a4s.
eriora1s
4e3rior5ment4e.
erio2r1m
eriorme1n
eriorme2n1t
4e3riorid4a4d.
eriori1d
eriori1da1d
4e3rioridad4e4s.
erioridade1s
4e3r4a3bl4e.
erab2l
4e3r4a3bl4e4s.
erable1s
4e3r4a3ble5ment4e.
erable1m
erableme1n
erableme2n1t
pe5r4ante
pera1n
pera2n1t
pe1rpon5d6r
1pe2r1p
perpo1n
perpo2n1d
sup6ra
supra1h
sup2r
supra1a2
supra1e2
supra1i2
supra1o2
supra1u2
supra1á2
supra1é2
supra1í2
supra1ó2
supra1ú2
talmo1h
ta1l
ta2l1m
talmo1a2
talmo1e2
talmo1i2
talmo1o2
talmo1u2
talmo1á2
talmo1é2
talmo1í2
talmo1ó2
talmo1ú2
tele1h
te1l
tele1a2
tele1e2
tele1i2
tele1o2
tele1u2
tele1á2
tele1é2
tele1í2
tele1ó2
tele1ú2
4óste4o.
ó1s
ó2s1t
4óst4e2o4s.
ósteo1s
tecno1h
te1c
te2c1n
tecno1a2
tecno1e2
tecno1i2
tecno1o2
tecno1u2
tecno1á2
tecno1é2
tecno1í2
tecno1ó2
tecno1ú2
.tele1i2m1p
.tele1i2
.te1l
.telei1m
.tele1o2b1j
.tele1o2
.teleo1b
.1tele4o3ló1t
.teleo1l
tera1h
te1r
tera1a2
tera1e2
tera1i2
tera1o2
tera1u2
tera1á2
tera1é2
tera1í2
tera1ó2
tera1ú2
termo1h
te2r1m
termo1a2
termo1e2
termo1i2
termo1o2
termo1u2
termo1á2
termo1é2
termo1í2
termo1ó2
termo1ú2
tetra1h
tet2r
tetra1a2
tetra1e2
tetra1i2
tetra1o2
tetra1u2
tetra1á2
tetra1é2
tetra1í2
tetra1ó2
tetra1ú2
topo1h
to1p
topo1a2
topo1e2
topo1i2
topo1o2
topo1u2
topo1á2
topo1é2
topo1í2
topo1ó2
topo1ú2
.tra2s1h
.t2r
.tra1s
.tra2sa2
.tra2se2
.tra2si2
.tra2so2
.tra2su2
.tra2sá2
.tra2sé2
.tra2sí2
.tra2só2
.tra2sú2
tras1abue1l
trasa1b
tras1alco1b
trasa1l
trasa2l1c
tras1a2l1p
t1ras1alta1r
1trasa2l1t
tras1a1ndi1n
trasa2n1d
1tras1a1tlá2n1t
trasa1t
trasa2t2l
trasatlá1n
tras1oceá1n
traso1c
tra3se3r4o.
t1rase1r
tra3s4e3r2o4s.
trasero1s
tra3se3r4a.
tra3se5r4a4s.
trasera1s
.tra3su3da
.trasu1d
.tra3su3dá
.tra3su3de
.tra3su3dé
.tra3su3do
.tra3su3dó
.tra3sunta
.trasu1n
.1trasu2n1t
.tra3suntá
.tra3sunte
.tra3sunté
.tra3sunto
.tra3suntó
.tra3so3ñ
.tra3se3g
.tra3sie1g
tran2s1h
tra1n
tra2n1s
tran2sa2
tran2se2
tran2si2
tran2so2
tran2su2
tran2sá2
tran2sé2
tran2sí2
tran2só2
tran2sú2
tran1s3amina1s
transa1m
transami1n
tran2s1a2n1d
transa1n
tran2s1a2t2l
transa1t
tran2s1oce
transo1c
t1ran2s1u1r
tran3sacci
transa1c
transa2c1c
tran3sacti1v
1transa2c1t
tra1n3seú1n
tran3se3xu
transe1x
tra1n3si3beria1n
transi1b
transibe1r
tra1n3si3cio1n
transi1c
tra1n3si3ció1n
tran3sid4o.
transi1d
tran3sid2o4s.
transido1s
tran3sid4a.
tran3sid4a4s.
transida1s
tran3si3gi
transi1g
tran3si3gí
tran3si3ge
tran3si3ja
transi1j
tran3si3já
tran3si3jo
tra1n3silva1n
transi1l
transi2l1v
tran3sisto
transi1s
1transi2s1t
tran3si3ta
1transi1t
tran3si3tá
tran3si3te
tran3si3té
tran3si3to
tran3si3tó
tran3si3ti1v
tran3si3tori
transito1r
trans3oraci
transo1r
transora1c
1tran3sub2s1t
transu1b
tran1su2b1s
1tran3su2s1t
transu1s
.tri1ó2x
tropo1h
tro1p
tropo1a2
tropo1e2
tropo1i2
tropo1o2
tropo1u2
tropo1á2
tropo1é2
tropo1í2
tropo1ó2
tropo1ú2
turbo1h
tu1r
tu2r1b
turbo1a2
turbo1e2
turbo1i2
turbo1o2
turbo1u2
turbo1á2
turbo1é2
turbo1í2
turbo1ó2
turbo1ú2
ultra1h
u1l
u2l1t
ult2r
ultra1a2
ultra1e2
ultra1i2
ultra1o2
ultra1u2
ultra1á2
ultra1é2
ultra1í2
ultra1ó2
ultra1ú2
vice1h
vi1c
vice1a2
vice1e2
vice1i2
vice1o2
vice1u2
vice1á2
vice1é2
vice1í2
vice1ó2
vice1ú2
video1h
vi1d
video1a2
video1e2
video1i2
video1o2
video1u2
video1á2
video1é2
video1í2
video1ó2
video1ú2
xeno1h
xe1n
xeno1a2
xeno1e2
xeno1i2
xeno1o2
xeno1u2
xeno1á2
xeno1é2
xeno1í2
xeno1ó2
xeno1ú2
xero1h
xe1r
xero1a2
xero1e2
xero1i2
xero1o2
xero1u2
xero1á2
xero1é2
xero1í2
xero1ó2
xero1ú2
xilo1h
xi1l
xilo1a2
xilo1e2
xilo1i2
xilo1o2
xilo1u2
xilo1á2
xilo1é2
xilo1í2
xilo1ó2
xilo1ú2
zoo1h
zoo1a2
zoo1e2
zoo1i2
zoo1o2
zoo1u2
zoo1á2
zoo1é2
zoo1í2
zoo1ó2
zoo1ú2
wa3s4h
wa1s
3graf4o.
3graf4a.
3graf2o4s.
grafo1s
3graf4a4s.
grafa1s
3graf4í4a.
3graf4í4a4s.
grafía1s
o4i3de4a.
oi1d
o4i3de4a4s.
oidea1s
o4i3d2a4l.
oida1l
o4i3d2al4e4s.
oidale1s
4o2i3d4e.
4o2i3d4e4s.
oide1s
4i2d2a4l.
ida1l
4i2d2al4e4s.
idale1s
4i3de4o.
4i3d4e2o4s.
ideo1s
i4o.
i2o4s.
io1s
2i3c4o.
2i3c2o4s.
ico1s
2i3c4a.
2i3c4a4s.
ica1s
4e3dr4o.
ed2r
4e3dr2o4s.
edro1s
4é3dr2i3c4o.
éd2r
édri1c
4é3dr2i3c2o4s.
édrico1s
4é3dr2i3c4a.
4é3dr2i3c4a4s.
édrica1s
4í3bl4e.
í1b
íb2l
4í3bl4e4s.
íble1s
3hablante
ha1b
hab2l
habla1n
habla2n1t
3habiente
habie1n2
habie2n3t
5humano
hu1m
huma1n
5humana
3a4ficiona1d
afi1c
aficio1n
3a4merica1n
ame1r
ameri1c
su2d3a4merica1n
su1d
suda1m
sudame1r
sudameri1c
su2r3a4merica1n
su1r
sura1m
surame1r
surameri1c
3e4lect2r
e1l
ele1c
ele2c1t
3e4léct2r
elé1c
elé2c1t
di4e5le1c
die1l
di4e5lé1c
5i4ndust2r
i2n1d
indu1s
indu2s1t
5islámi
islá1m
5islami
5ingenie1r
i2n1g
inge1n
5té1cni1c
té1c
té2c1n
5bio3logía
bio1l
biolo1g
5céntrico
cé1n
cé2n1t
cént2r
céntri1c
5e4cuatoria1l
ecua1t
ecuato1r
7u4niversi1d
u1n
uni1v
unive1r
unive2r1s
5u4niversi1t
